Wyoming, session 2025, SF0075.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 7-4-207(b) and by creating a new
subsection (c) is amended to read:
7-4-207. Disposition of body and effects of deceased.
(b) The coroner shall, within a reasonable time after
completing the investigation, turn over to the appointed
personal representative of the estate of the deceased or,
if none, to the clerk of the district court of the county,
is found the coroner shall make a good faith effort to
contact the deceased's next of kin and the coroner shall
dispose of all money or other property found upon the body
of the deceased in accordance with subsection (c) of this
section. Personal items valued at less than fifty dollars
($50.00) and items necessary for the convenience of the
deceased's next of kin may be released to the deceased's
next of kin.
(c) If there is no personal representative of the
estate and if the deceased's next of kin does not claim the
money and property found upon the body of the deceased
within one hundred eighty (180) days, the coroner shall
cause the property to be sold at public auction to the
highest bidder or by any other means of sale adopted by the
county in which the investigation occurs. All money and any
proceeds from the sale or auction of the property shall
first be used to pay the expenses of the burial in
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0075
ENROLLED ACT NO. 30, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
accordance with subsection (a) of this section. Any
remaining money and proceeds in excess of fifty dollars
($50.00) shall be deposited and placed in the custody of
the state treasurer under the Uniform Unclaimed Property
Act.
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2